Utah statutes.
34A-7-104.   Fees.

The owner or user of a boiler required by this part to be inspected shall pay to the commission fees for inspection or for permits to operate in amounts set by the commission pursuant to Section 63J-1-504.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

